Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-566
Bonded indebtedness; election; conduct; proclamation.

The respective election boards shall conduct the election in their respective precincts in the manner prescribed by law for the holding of general elections, and shall make their returns to the secretary of the district. At any regular or special meeting of the board held not earlier than five days following the date of such election, the returns thereof shall be canvassed and the results thereof declared. In the event that any election held hereunder shall be consolidated with any primary or general election, the returns thereof shall be made and canvassed at the time and in the manner provided by law for the canvass of the returns of such primary or general election. It shall be the duty of such canvassing body or bodies to promptly certify and transmit to the board a statement of the result of the vote upon the proposition submitted hereunder. Upon receipt of such certificate, it shall be the duty of the board to tabulate and declare the results of the election held hereunder.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 32, p. 555.